Utah statutes.
31A-35-606.   Bail agreement prior to commission of offense prohibited.
A bail bond surety or bail bond producer may not enter into an agreement or
arrangement with any person, guaranteeing or assuring in advance of the
commission of any offense that bail will be furnished to that person or any
other party if arrested.
